Indiana, session 2026, SB54.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-7-4-617 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 617. (a) This section
does not apply to an overlay district that is established in a unit
before January 1, 2026.
(b) As used in this section, "commercial solar energy project",
or "CSE project", means a project involving the construction,
installation, siting, modification, operation, or decommissioning of
one (1) or more CSE systems in a unit.
(c) As used in this section, "commercial solar energy system",
or "CSE system", means a system, however denominated in a
zoning ordinance or by a permit authority, that captures and
converts solar energy into electricity:
(1) for the purpose of selling the electricity at wholesale; and
(2) for use in locations other than where it is generated.
The term includes solar panels, collection and feeder lines,
generation tie lines, substations, ancillary buildings, solar
2026 IN 54—LS 6264/DI 101


monitoring stations, and accessory equipment or structures. The
term does not include a solar energy device (as defined in
IC 32-23-4-3) that is installed on a property owner's premises for
the purpose of meeting or offsetting all or part of the need for
heating, cooling, or electrical power on the premises.
(d) As used in this section, "overlay district" means a
supplemental district, however denominated in a zoning ordinance
or by a permit authority, that:
(1) extends across one (1) or more:
(A) underlying zoning districts; or
(B) parts of one (1) or more underlying zoning districts;
and
(2) prescribes additional or alternative regulations to the
regulations applicable to each underlying zoning district with
respect to a specific critical feature or resource.
(e) As used in this section, "permit authority" refers to:
(1) a unit; or
(2) any applicable board, commission, or other governing
body of a unit;
that makes legislative or administrative decisions concerning the
permitting, construction, installation, siting, modification,
operation, or decommissioning of CSE systems in the unit.
(f) As used in this section, "unit" has the meaning set forth in
IC 8-1-42-8.
(g) After December 31, 2025, a permit authority may not
establish in a unit an overlay district in which one (1) or more CSE
projects will be located unless each underlying zoning district
across which the proposed overlay district will extend is zoned for
a use that, under the unit's existing zoning ordinance at the time
the overlay district is proposed, permits the location of a CSE
project within that underlying district. If one (1) or more
underlying zoning districts across which the proposed overlay
district will extend is not zoned for a use that, under the unit's
existing zoning ordinance at the time the overlay district is
proposed, permits the location of a CSE project within that
underlying district, each such underlying zoning district, or part of
the zoning district, must be rezoned, in accordance with this
chapter, for a use that permits the location of a CSE project within
all or part of the underlying zoning district.
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 54—LS 6264/DI 101